Hawaii statutes.
[§663A-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Mercantile establishment" means any
place where merchandise is displayed, held, or offered for sale at retail.

"Merchandise" means all things
movable and capable of manual delivery.

"Owner" means any person who owns or
operates a mercantile establishment or the agents or employees of that person.

"Shoplifting" means the specific type
of theft offense defined in section 708-830(8). [L 1985, c 275, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next